Illinois, session 104th, HB3586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Condominium and Common Interest Community 5Ombudsperson Act is amended by changing Section 25 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 615/25)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 25. Training and education.9    (a) On or before July 1, 2017, the Ombudsperson shall 10offer training, outreach, and educational materials, and may 11arrange for the offering of courses to unit owners, 12associations, boards of managers, and boards of directors in 13subjects relevant to: (i) the operation and management of 14condominiums and common interest communities; and (ii) the 15Condominium Property Act and the Common Interest Community 16Association Act. 17    (b) On or before July 1, 2026, the Ombudsperson shall 18require training within 90 days of election or appointment by 19elected and appointed members of board of managers or board of 20directors on the following subjects:21        (1) ethics to include the fiduciary responsibilities, 22    conflict of interest, and communication between board 23    members;  HB3586- 2 -LRB104 08314 JRC 18365 b1        (2) roles and responsibilities of each officer of a 2    board of managers or directors and a property management 3    company;4        (3) attributes of a property-managed association and 5    self-run association; and6        (4) information and direction about the complaint 7    process against a board of managers or directors.8    (c) Members of a board of managers or directors who 9complete the training do not have to retake it again for 3 10years.11    (d) The Ombudsperson may adopt rules to implement this 12amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and determine the 13composition and delivery of required training. 14(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 1599-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 168-12-16.)